Georgia, session 2025_26, HB801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to re-create and establish the Board of Commissioners of Long County, approved
March 10, 1988 (Ga. L. 1988, p. 3755), as amended, is amended by revising Section 4 and
adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 4.
Chairperson.
The chairperson of the board shall:
H. B. 801
- 1 -

LC 47 3633/AP
(1) Preside at all meetings of the board unless otherwise adopted by appropriate
resolution. The rules of order shall be governed by Robert's Rules of Order unless
otherwise adopted by appropriate resolution; and
(2) Be recognized as the official head of Long County, Georgia, by state, federal, and
other authorities.
SECTION 4.1.
County manager.
(a) The board shall employ a county manager who shall be responsible for the supervision,
direction, and control of the administration of the affairs of Long County. The board shall,
by appropriate ordinance, set and determine the terms and conditions of employment,
limitations of authority, scope of duties, compensation, and grounds for termination of the
county manager.
(b) In the event of a vacancy in the office of county manager, whether by reason of death,
incapacity, or termination, the board may, by majority vote upon a proper motion at a
meeting held pursuant to Code Section 50-14-1 of the O.C.G.A., authorize the chairperson
of the board to serve as interim county manager; provided, however, that such authorization
shall expire 90 days following such vote by the board."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 801
- 2 -